Utah statutes.
26A-1-119.   Local health department fund -- Sources -- Uses.
(1)  The treasurer of a local health department shall, as part of the
department organization, create a local health department fund to which shall
be credited any moneys appropriated or otherwise made available by
participating counties or other local political subdivisions, and any moneys
received from the state, federal government, or from surpluses, grants, fees,
or donations for local health purposes.
(2) (a)  Moneys credited to the fund shall be placed in a restricted account
and expended only for maintenance and operation of the local health
department.
(b)  Claims or demands against the fund shall be allowed on certification by
the health officer or other employee of the local health department designated
by the health officer.
